Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 28 Address Confidentiality for Victims of Domestic Violence

17-28-1.
Purpose. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The general assembly finds that persons attempting to escape from actual or threatened domestic violence frequently establish new addresses in order to prevent their assailants or probable assailants from finding them. The purpose of this chapter is to enable victims of domestic violence and members of their household to participate in the electoral process by providing address confidentiality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1.

17-28-1.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-2.
Definitions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

“Address” means a residential street address, of an individual, as specified on the individual’s application to be a program participant under this chapter.

“Program participant” means a person certified as a program participant under §

17-28-3

.

“Victim of domestic violence” means an individual who has a restraining order issued by the family, superior, or district court pursuant to §§

15-15-1

, 15-15-9, or

8-8.1-3

or a domestic violence no contact order issued by the superior or district court pursuant to §

12-29-4

or a restraining order or no contact order issued by a court in another state for their protection and any individual living within the same household as the recipient of the restraining order or no contact order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 316, § 1.

17-28-2.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 316, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-3.
Address confidentiality program — Application — Certification. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

An adult person who is a victim of domestic violence and any member of his/her household may apply to the secretary of state to have an address designated by the secretary of state serve as the person’s address. The secretary of state shall approve an application if it is filed in the manner and on the form prescribed by the secretary of state and if it contains:

A sworn statement by the applicant:

That the applicant is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in §

17-28-2(c)

of this chapter;

That the applicant fears for his or her safety or his or her children’s safety, or;

That the applicant resides in the same household as a victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection

17-28-2(c)

; and

That the individual who committed the domestic violence has knowledge that the applicant lives in the same household as the victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection 17-28-2(c).

The mailing address where the applicant can be contacted by the secretary of state, and the phone number or numbers where the applicant can be called by the secretary of state;

The new address or addresses that the applicant requests not be disclosed for the reason that disclosure will increase the risk of domestic violence;

The signature of the applicant, and of any individual or representative of any office designated in writing under §

17-28-6

who assisted in the preparation of the application, and the date on which the applicant signed the application.

Applications shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state.

Upon filing a properly completed application, the secretary of state shall certify the applicant as a program participant. Applicants shall be certified for four (4) years following the date of filing unless the certification is withdrawn or invalidated before that date. The secretary of state shall establish by rule a renewal procedure.

A person who falsely attests in an application that disclosure of the applicant’s address would endanger the applicant’s safety or the safety of the applicant’s children, or who knowingly provides false or incorrect information upon making an application, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 316, § 1.

17-28-3.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 316, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-4.
Certification cancellation. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If the program participant obtains a name change, he or she shall lose certification as a program participant.

The secretary of state may cancel a program participant’s certification if there is a change in the residential address from the one listed on the application, unless the program participant provides the secretary of state with seven (7) days’ prior notice of the change of address.

The secretary of state may cancel certification of a program participant if mail forwarded by the secretary to the program participant’s address is returned as non-deliverable.

The secretary of state shall cancel certification of a program participant who applies using false information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1.

17-28-4.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-5.
Voting by program participant — Use of designated address by board of canvassers. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A program participant qualified to vote may apply for a mail ballot for all elections in the city or town in which that individual resides in the same manner as mail ballot voters who qualify under §

17-20-1

et seq. The program participant may use his or her designated address on the mail ballot application. The board of canvassers shall transmit the ballot to the program participant at the address designated in the application. Neither the name nor the address of a program participant shall be included in any list of registered voters available to the public.

The board of canvassers may not make the participant’s address contained in voter registration records available for public inspection or copying except under the following circumstances:

If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency; and

If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1.

17-28-5.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-6.
Disclosure of address prohibited — Exceptions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state may not make a program participant’s address, other than the address designated by the secretary of state, available for inspection or copying, except under the following circumstances:

If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency;

If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order; and

If certification has been canceled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 99.

17-28-6.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 99; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-7.
Assistance for program applicants. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state shall designate state and local agencies and nonprofit agencies that provide counseling and shelter services to victims of domestic violence to assist persons applying to be program participants. Any assistance and counseling rendered by the office of the secretary of state or its designee to applicants shall in no way be construed as legal advice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1.

17-28-7.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-8.
Adoption of rules. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state and board of elections shall adopt rules to facilitate the administration of this chapter by state and local agencies and boards of canvassers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1.

17-28-8.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 339, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

17-28-9.
Voting by participant in the address confidentiality program. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A participant in the address confidentiality program established by chapter 164 of title 42 who is qualified to vote may apply for a mail ballot for all elections in the city or town in which that individual resides in the same manner as mail ballot voters who qualify under chapter 20 of this title. The program participant may use his or her substitute address on the mail ballot application. The board of canvassers shall transmit the ballot to the program participant at the address designated in the application.

No election official shall release a program participant’s actual address. Neither the name nor the address of a program participant shall be included in any list of registered voters available to the public.

The secretary of state and the board of elections may adopt any rules or regulations deemed necessary to facilitate administration of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 190, § 3, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 191, § 3, effective January 1, 2023.